Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
EDUCATOR PREPARATION
STIPEND PROGRAMS

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1220, see section 1 of chapter 239, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

23-3.9-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Academic residency" means a sixteen-week or a thirty-two-week intentional clinical experience for student educators who are placed in a school- or community-based setting.

"Approved program of preparation" means an approved educator preparation program, as defined in section 23-1-121 (1)(a), including a preparation program for school counselors, or an alternative teacher program, as defined in section 22-60.5-102 (5).

"Commission" means the Colorado commission on higher education created and existing pursuant to article 1 of this title 23.

"Department" means the department of higher education created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-114.

"Educator" means a teacher or a school counselor.

"Educator test stipend program" means the educator test stipend program created in section 23-3.9-303.

"Eligible student" means a student who is:

Enrolled in an approved program of preparation; and

Eligible for financial assistance because the student's expected family contribution does not exceed two hundred percent of the maximum federal Pell-eligible expected family contribution.

"Institution of higher education" means a public postsecondary institution authorized by the commission to offer approved programs of preparation.

"School counselor" means a person who holds a special services provider license with a school counselor endorsement issued pursuant to article 60.5 of title 22 or who is otherwise endorsed or accredited by a national association to provide school counseling services.

"Student educator" means an educator candidate who is participating in an academic residency and placed in a school- or community-based setting.

"Student educator stipend program" means the student educator stipend program created in section 23-3.9-302.

"Teacher" means a person employed to instruct students enrolled in a public school in the state.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1767, § 2, effective May 26.

23-3.9-302. Student educator stipend program - created - guidelines - definition - repeal.

There is created in the department the student educator stipend program, referred to in this section as the "stipend program". The purpose of the stipend program is to award stipend money to an eligible student to reduce the financial barriers to entering the educator workforce while the student is a student educator.

The commission shall adopt any necessary policies and the department shall adopt any necessary guidelines to implement and administer the stipend program. The department shall collect data to measure the effectiveness of the stipend program, which data must include, but need not be limited to:

The total number of eligible students served by each approved program of preparation;

The total amount of stipend money each eligible student receives each year;

A survey of eligible students to measure the eligible students' experience with the stipend program;

The demographic data of each eligible student aggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The reported number of hours each eligible student works a second job to earn income;

A comparison of eligible students' financial burdens with the national average of financial burdens imposed on students enrolled in teacher and counselor preparation programs; and

The data correlation between eligible students who receive stipends through the student educator stipend program and the subsequent placement and retention of those eligible students as educators, to the extent the data is available.

To qualify to participate in the stipend program, a student must be an eligible student and placed as a student educator. No later than July 1, 2022, and no later than July 1 each year thereafter, each approved program of preparation shall notify the department of the eligible students who qualify for the stipend program.

No later than August 1, 2022, and no later than August 1 each year thereafter, the department, subject to available appropriations, shall disburse to each approved program of preparation money to distribute as stipend money to each eligible student, plus additional money to pay the direct costs of operating the stipend program. The approved program of preparation shall distribute stipend money, using the standard methods for allocating state-based financial aid or as wages for employment, to each eligible student in monthly installments.

An eligible student placed as a student educator in a sixteen-week academic residency may receive a stipend of eleven thousand dollars, and an eligible student placed as a student educator in a thirty-two-week academic residency may receive a stipend of twenty-two thousand dollars.

The stipend amounts set forth in subsection (2)(b)(II) of this section must be annually adjusted by the rate of inflation. The amounts must be rounded to the nearest dollar. As used in this subsection (2)(b)(III), "inflation" means the annual percentage change in the United States department of labor bureau of labor statistics consumer price index for Denver-Aurora-Lakewood for all items paid by all urban consumers, or its applicable successor index.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (2)(b)(II) and (2)(b)(III) of this section, if the amount appropriated in a state fiscal year is insufficient to fully fund stipends for the total number of eligible students for that state fiscal year, the department shall reduce the amount distributed to each approved program of preparation by the same percentage that the deficit bears to the amount required to fully fund the total number of eligible students who qualify for the stipend program. Each approved program of preparation shall reduce the stipend amounts distributed to each eligible student in proportion to the deficit.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate money to the department to implement this section, including money to pay the costs of implementing and administering the stipend program, which may include the direct costs incurred by the approved program of preparation in operating the stipend program.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate to the department thirty-nine million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created pursuant to section 24-75-228 to fund stipends for eligible students.

The department or the stipend recipients shall spend or obligate any money received pursuant to this subsection (4) by December 30, 2024. Any money obligated by December 31, 2024, must be expended by December 31, 2026.

The department and any person who receives money from the department, including each stipend recipient, shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective January 31, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1768, § 2, effective May 26.

23-3.9-303. Educator test stipend program - created - guidelines - repeal.

There is created in the department the educator test stipend program, referred to in this section as the "stipend program". The purpose of the stipend program is to award stipend money to an approved program of preparation to reduce financial barriers for eligible students by paying the fees and costs, which may include travel and lodging costs, associated with the assessment of professional competencies required for licensure and required endorsements pursuant to sections 22-60.5-203 and 22-60.5-212.

The commission shall adopt any necessary policies and the department shall adopt any necessary guidelines to implement and administer the stipend program.

In its adoption of any necessary policies pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section, the commission shall create a formula for calculating the amount of stipend money awarded to each approved program of preparation based on the total number of eligible students in an approved program of preparation and the amount required to pay the fees and costs associated with the assessment of professional competencies for licensure and the required endorsement for each eligible student.

The department shall collect data to measure the effectiveness of the stipend program, which data includes, but need not be limited to:

The total number of eligible students served by each approved program of preparation;

The total amount of stipend money each eligible student receives each year;

A survey of eligible students to measure the eligible students' experience with the stipend program;

The demographic data of each eligible student aggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender;

The reported number of hours each eligible student works a second job to earn income;

A comparison of eligible students' financial burdens with the national average of financial burdens imposed on students enrolled in teacher and counselor preparation programs; and

The data correlation between the eligible students who receive stipend money through the educator test stipend program and the subsequent placement and retention of those eligible students as educators, to the extent the data is available.

To qualify to participate in the stipend program, a student must be an eligible student. No later than July 1, 2022, and no later than July 1 each year thereafter, each approved program of preparation shall notify the department of the number of eligible students who qualify for the stipend program.

No later than August 1, 2022, and no later than August 1 each year thereafter, the department, subject to available appropriations, shall disburse to each approved program of preparation stipend money, plus additional money to pay the direct costs of operating the stipend program. The approved program of preparation shall distribute the stipend money to each eligible student to pay the fees and costs associated with the assessment of professional competencies for licensure and the required endorsement.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (2)(b)(I) of this section, if the amount appropriated is insufficient to fully fund the total number of eligible students, the approved program of preparation shall reduce the stipend amounts paid to each eligible student in proportion to the deficit.

The approved program of preparation shall determine the number of times an eligible student may be reimbursed if the student must retake the assessment of professional competencies.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate money to the department to implement this section, including money to pay the costs of implementing and administering the stipend program, which may include the direct costs incurred by approved programs of preparation in operating the stipend program.

For the 2022-23 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate to the department three million dollars from the economic recovery and relief cash fund created pursuant to section 24-75-228 to fund stipends for eligible students.

The department or the stipend recipient shall spend or obligate any stipend money received pursuant to this subsection (4) by December 30, 2024. Any money obligated by December 31, 2024, must be expended by December 31, 2026.

The department and any person who receives money from the department, including each stipend recipient, shall comply with the compliance, reporting, record-keeping, and program evaluation requirements established by the office of state planning and budgeting and the state controller in accordance with section 24-75-226 (5).

This subsection (4) is repealed, effective January 31, 2027.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1770, § 2, effective May 26.

23-3.9-304. Reporting requirements.

The department shall include the following data concerning the student educator stipend program and the educator test stipend program in the annual report required in section 23-1-121 (6)(a):

The total number of eligible students receiving stipend money for the student educator stipend program in the preceding state fiscal year;

The total number of approved programs of preparation and eligible students receiving stipend money for the educator test stipend program in the preceding state fiscal year;

The total number of eligible students, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender, participating in the student educator stipend program and educator test stipend program;

The data correlation between the eligible students who receive stipends through the student educator stipend program and educator test stipend program and the subsequent placement and retention of those eligible students as educators, to the extent the data is available;

The name of the approved program of preparation where each eligible student is enrolled;

The total amount of stipend money awarded to each approved program of preparation;

The total amount of stipend money awarded to each eligible student for the student educator stipend program in the preceding state fiscal year;

The total amount of stipend money awarded to each eligible student for the educator test stipend program in the preceding state fiscal year;

A summary of data collected from the eligible students and the approved program of preparation concerning the effectiveness of each stipend program, as described in sections 23-3.9-302 (1)(b) and 23-3.9-303 (1)(c);

For the purposes of section 23-3.9-302, the name of the school- or community-based setting where each eligible student is completing the eligible student's academic residency;

For the purposes of section 23-3.9-303, the total number of times each eligible student sits for the assessment of professional competencies required pursuant to sections 22-60.5-203 and 22-60.5-212;

For purposes of section 23-3.9-303, the assessment passage rate for each eligible student who sits for the assessment of professional competencies required pursuant to sections 22-60.5-203 and 22-60.5-212;

For purposes of section 23-3.9-303, the demographic data of eligible students, disaggregated by race, ethnicity, and gender, who sit for the assessment of professional competencies required pursuant to sections 22-60.5-203 and 22-60.5-212;

For purposes of section 23-3.9-303, the assessment passage rate for each approved program of preparation; and

Recommendations, if any, for legislative or regulatory changes to facilitate the effective implementation of the student educator stipend program and the educator test stipend program.

Notwithstanding section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I) to the contrary, the reporting requirements set forth in subsection (1) of this section continue indefinitely.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1220), ch. 239, p. 1772, § 2, effective May 26.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1220, see section 1 of chapter 239, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.